Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 7. Licenses, Stamps, Permits and Tags

§ 23-1-701.
Selling agents; administration of oaths; licenses, permits and game tags.

The commission with the advice of the director shall appoint agents to sell game, bird and fish licenses. Any vendor engaged in the commercial sale of sporting goods and equipment who holds a valid sales tax license issued by the department of revenue under W.S.

39-15-106

may apply to the commission and shall be appointed as an agent to sell game, bird and fish licenses, permits and stamps. At the end of each year, the commission shall renew the appointment of agents who had combined game, bird and fish license, permit and stamp sales during that year of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Renewal of the appointment of agents selling fish licenses only or agents serving remote locations shall not be subject to the one thousand dollar ($1,000.00) minimum sales requirement. The commission shall provide bonding for agents for the purpose of selling game, bird and fish licenses, permits and stamps. Bonding shall be provided upon receipt of a nonrefundable annual fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). The fees shall be deposited in a bond pool fund except in any month when the bond pool fund contains one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) or more the fees shall be deposited in the game and fish fund. The fee shall be paid to the commission before December 1 preceding the year for which the bond shall be in effect. Newly appointed agents shall pay the same fee immediately upon appointment by the commission to receive bonding for the remainder of the calendar year in which the agent was appointed. All claims against an agent’s bond shall be paid from the bond pool account.

Each license selling agent shall charge a fee as provided in this subsection for each license, permit or stamp he sells or distributes pursuant to this act. The fee shall not be charged if this act specifies that the issuance shall be without fee or fails to establish a fee for the issuance of the license, permit or stamp. Each license, permit or stamp sold or distributed under this act shall display the total amount only of all fees and other charges required under this act or otherwise provided by law. Each selling agent shall retain two dollars ($2.00) for each license and fifty cents ($.50) for each stamp or permit he sells. For failure to comply with this section, selling agents shall not be entitled to retain the amounts specified in this subsection and shall be liable on their bond. No employee of the commission shall receive any commission on licenses, stamps or permits sold, but the department shall charge the additional fee specified in this subsection, or otherwise provided by law, for each license, stamp or permit sold by commission employees. The fee charged under this subsection shall be in addition to the amount otherwise established by this act for the license, permit or stamp and shall be as follows:

Two dollars ($2.00) for each license, except that this additional fee shall not be charged for licenses under W.S. 23-1-705(e) or (k), 23-2-101(j)(xi), (xvi), (xvii), (xx), (xxi), (xxxii), (xxxiii), (xliv) or (xlv), 23-2-201(d)(iii) or (iv) or (f) or 23-2-301(c)(xiii);

Fifty cents ($.50) for each stamp;

Fifty cents ($.50) for each permit, except that this additional fee shall not be charged for permits under W.S. 23-1-302(m).

Every selling agent shall file a report with the commission at such times and in such manner as prescribed by commission rule and shall account for all licenses, permits, and stamps received by the selling agent to the commission.

Every person authorized by the commission or by law to sell and issue licenses is authorized to administer oaths.

The department shall supply sufficient numbers of self-locking tags stamped with the words “Wyoming interstate game tag”. The commission by rule may authorize the distribution of interstate game tags by taxidermists, meat processing plants or other businesses as the commission determines. The commission by rule may set the commissions for the sale of interstate game tags not to exceed the commissions paid to license selling agents for the sale of licenses. The commission by rule may also set the reporting requirements for businesses authorized to distribute interstate game tags. Interstate game tags shall be furnished through the chief game warden for distribution to the game wardens, and such game tag distributors as the commission may designate. Game wardens and game tag distributors shall collect and remit to the department the proper fee for each Wyoming interstate game tag.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 156, § 2.

License selling agents under this section shall be considered representatives of the game and fish department for the purpose of charging fees for costs of processing payments for sales of licenses, permits or stamps. In addition to fees under subsection (b) of this section a license selling agent may charge and collect from the person tendering payment a fee for the cost of processing the payment in the same manner and amount as established by commission rule for sales directly from the game and fish department.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, §§ 23, 33, 87; C.S. 1945, §§ 47-123, 47-206, 47-526; W.S. 1957, §§ 23-85, 23-87, 23-88; Laws 1959, ch. 195, § 1; 1971, ch. 186, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-23; Laws 1979, ch. 100, § 1; 1983, ch. 151, § 1; 1985, ch. 105, § 1; 1987, ch. 156, § 2; 1989, ch. 34, § 1; 1995, ch. 176, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; 2006, ch. 9, § 1; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; 2010, ch. 45, § 1; 2011, ch. 42, § 1; 2020 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming game and fish commission, see §

23-1-201

.

As to director of Wyoming game and fish department, see §

23-1-401

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, substituted “permits and stamps” for “tags” throughout; rewrote (b), increasing fees, inter alia; in (e) twice deleted “Wyoming game tag or” preceding “Wyomiing interstate game tag,” twice substituted “game tag distributors” for “selling agents,” and added the second through fourth sentences; and made related changes.

The 2006 amendment

inserted “or otherwise provided by law” in two places in (b); rewrote (c), in part by deleting “On or before the 10th of each month” at the beginning, and made stylistic and related changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 9, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, substituted “two dollars ($2.00)” for “one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50)” in the introductory paragraph to (b) and “Two dollars ($2.00)” for “One dollar ($1.00)” in (b)(i).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010,
in (b)(i), inserted “(xliv) or (xlv),” and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(i), inserted “or (k).”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (g).

§ 23-1-702.
Duplicate license upon loss or destruction of original; issuance; fees.

When any license issued under this act has been lost or destroyed, the licensee may secure a duplicate of the original license from any district office or any authorized personnel of the department upon the presentation of satisfactory proof that the original license was lost or destroyed. Prior to issuing the duplicate license and in accordance with rule and regulation of the commission, the department may assess a fee of not more than five dollars ($5.00) plus the fees charged under W.S.

23-1-701

. Duplicate licenses shall be issued in accordance with procedure established by commission order.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 77; C.S. 1945, § 47-515; W.S. 1957, § 23-44; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-24; Laws 2001, ch. 6, § 1; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, added “plus the fee charged under W.S.

23-1-701

” at the end of the second to last sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective January. 1, 2018, substituted “five dollars ($5.00) plus the fees” for “three dollars ($3.00) plus the fee.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-1-703.
Limitation of number of certain licenses; reservation of certain licenses; reservation of certain unused licenses.

The commission may limit the number of resident or nonresident big or trophy game animal licenses or wild bison licenses to be sold in any calendar year and may designate dates after which one (1) or more classes of licenses will not be sold except as authorized by the commission.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, no person may apply for and receive more than one (1) cow or calf moose or one (1) ewe or lamb bighorn sheep license in any consecutive five (5) year period. Licenses issued under this subsection shall be issued partially through a preference point drawing and partially through a random drawing of all remaining unsuccessful applicants for that year. The department shall assign points to each license applicant for a specific species by multiplying the number of years the applicant has unsuccessfully applied for a license times one (1). The calculation used to assign points to an applicant for a particular species under this subsection shall include any year the applicant does not apply for a big or trophy game animal hunting license for that species, provided in the case of a resident the applicant pays the fee specified in W.S. 23-2-101(k), and in the case of a nonresident, the applicant pays the appropriate fee established by the commission under W.S. 23-2-101(m). License applicants within each hunt area for a species shall be grouped according to the number of assigned points for that species. Not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of available licenses within any hunt area shall be randomly selected through a preference point drawing from among the group of applicants with the largest number of assigned points and shall continue until all applicants within that group have been exhausted or until all available licenses have been issued, whichever first occurs. If any applicant grouping has been exhausted and licenses remain available within that hunt area, selection shall continue from among the group of applicants with the next largest number of assigned points. After the selections through the preference point drawing have been completed within a hunt area, the remaining licenses available from that drawing and the licenses available for the random drawing for that hunt area will be issued through a random selection from among all applicants in the hunt area who were not selected for issuance of a license for the species through the preference point drawing in that hunt area. For purposes of assigning points under this subsection, any unsuccessful license applicant failing to apply for a license, or pay the applicable fee in lieu of applying, during the second calendar year shall be considered to be a first year applicant for any subsequent calendar year in which the applicant submits license application for that particular species.

Except as provided in this subsection and subsection (f) of this section or by rule of the commission, no person who is issued a hunting license on and after July 1, 2022 for a grizzly bear, or for a mountain goat, any moose or antlered moose, any ram bighorn sheep, any bighorn sheep and any wild bison, and no person who, on July 1, 2022, is subject to the five (5) year restriction under subsection (b) of this section for a moose or bighorn sheep license, shall be eligible to apply for or receive a hunting license for that particular species in any future year. The commission may issue hunting licenses to any person in future years when necessary for wildlife management purposes to harvest grizzly bear, mountain goat, ewe or lamb bighorn sheep or cow or calf moose. The commission may issue hunting licenses to any person to harvest cow or calf wild bison pursuant to W.S. 23-2-107(f).

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 24, § 2.

The commission shall reserve ninety percent (90%) of the bighorn sheep, wild bison, moose, mountain goat and grizzly bear licenses to be issued in any one (1) year for resident hunters and the remaining ten percent (10%) of the bighorn sheep, wild bison, moose, mountain goat and grizzly bear licenses shall be reserved for nonresident hunters. The commission shall determine the allocation of resident and nonresident mountain lion harvest.

Notwithstanding W.S.

23-1-704

, 23-2-101(j) and 23-2-107(e), any person who is issued and purchases a license listed in paragraph (i) of this subsection, but who does not use the license, may reserve a license for the particular species and sex of animal designated on the unused license for use during the immediately succeeding hunting season by applying to the commission in accordance with commission rules as provided in this subsection. Upon receipt of an application that establishes the conditions listed in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection, the commission shall cancel the initial license and prior to the subsequent season opening date for the designated species and sex of animal, issue to the applicant at an administrative cost of ten dollars ($10.00), a license for the designated animal valid for that season. A person may apply for and reserve a license under this subsection only if all the following conditions exist:

The license is one (1) of the following:

A limited quota, full price big game animal license;

A trophy game animal license;

An any wild bison license;

A female or calf wild bison license.

The person is unable to use the license in the year for which it was issued and good cause, as defined in commission rule and regulation, exists for the person’s inability to use the license in the year for which it was issued;

The person submits an application to the commission that demonstrates eligibility under this subsection before the closing date of the season for which the initial license was issued;

The person submits the initial license with the application.

In addition to the authority granted under subsection (b) of this section, the commission may through rule and regulation develop and implement a preference point program for nonresident antelope, nonresident deer and nonresident elk licenses which are limited in quota and would otherwise be issued through a random drawing. A program established pursuant to this subsection may be implemented for all or selected hunt areas and may be applied to all or portions of licenses for any particular species. The commission may charge nonresident license applicants a nonrefundable fee to accumulate preference points under the program as provided in W.S. 23-2-101(m).

Rules and regulations shall be promulgated by the game and fish commission to carry out subsections (a) through (f) of this section and may be promulgated as provided in subsection (g) of this section.

History.

Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 7; 1949, ch. 76, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-42; Laws 1969, ch. 129, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-25; Laws 1975, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 100, § 1; 1994, ch. 88, § 1; 1995, ch. 73, § 1; 1997, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 27, § 1; ch. 44, § 1; ch. 92, § 1; 2004, ch. 30, § 1; 2009, ch. 83, § 1; 2015 ch. 25, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 149, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2018 ch. 9, § 1, effective March 9, 2018; 2018 ch. 89, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing multiple applications for limited licenses, see §

23-2-109

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, in (b), in the fifth sentence, distinguished between fees for residents and nonresidents, and inserted “or pay the applicable fee in lieu of applying” in the last sentence; added (g); and redesignated former (g) as (h) and rewrote it to make the promulgation of rules by the commission directory rather than mandatory for the provisions in (g).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b) inserted “ram” preceding “bighorn sheep” in the first sentence, in (e) inserted “ram and ewe and lamb” preceding “bighorn sheep”, and in (f) inserted “and sex of animal” following “species” in the first and third sentences.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in (f), inserted “limited quota, full price,” deleted “specified under subsections (b) and (c) of this section” preceding “and is unable to use,” inserted “big or trophy game” preceding “animal designated” in the first sentence, and substituted “to the applicant at an administrative cost not less than ten dollars ($10.00) and not to exceed four percent (4%) of the cost of the initial license” for “at no cost to the applicant” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

at the end of (e), inserted “The commission shall determine the allocation of resident and nonresident mountain lion harvest.”

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 9, §
1, in (c), substituted “except as provided in subsection (f) of this section or by rule of the commission, no person” for “except as specifically provided under subsection (f) of this section, no person.”

Laws 2018, ch. 9, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 89, § 1, effective January 1, 2019, in
the first sentence of (f), substituted “license during the
hunting season for which the license is issued” for “license
for the year in which issued,” “succeeding hunting season
by applying” for “succeeding calendar year by applying,”
and “commission in accordance with commission rules”
for “commission before the opening date of the season for the
designated species and sex of animal during the year for which the
initial license is issued”; and in the third sentence, inserted
“subsequent” preceding “season opening date,”
deleted “during the immediately succeeding calendar year”
following “species and sex of animal,” and substituted
“valid for that season” for “valid for that year.”

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory of (f), substituted ”W.S.

23-1-704

, 23-2-101(j) and 23-2-107(e)” for
“W.S.

23-1-704

and 23-2-101(j),” ”license listed in paragraph (i) of this subsection, but who does not use the license” for “limited quota, full price big or trophy game animal license for any species and sex of animal and is unable to use for good cause as provided by regulations that license for the year in which issued,” “sex of big or trophy game animal” for “sex of animal,” “commission rules as provided in this subsection. Upon receipt of an application that establishes the conditions listed in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection, the commission shall cancel” for “commission rules. The initial big or trophy game animal license shall accompany the application. Upon receipt, the commission shall cancel,” “cost of ten dollars ($10.00)” for “cost not less than of ten dollars ($10.00), and not to exceed four percent (4%) of the cost of the initial license,” “designated animal valid” for ”designated big or trophy game animal,” added the last sentence; and added (f)(i) through (f)(iv).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or wild bison licenses” in (a); in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “Subject to subsection (c) of this section” for “Except as specifically provided under this subsection, subsection (f) of this section or W.S. 23-1-705(a),” added “cow or calf,” substituted “ewe or lamb” for “ram,” deleted the former second sentence, which read, “Effective for the 1995 hunting season and each hunting season thereafter, licenses issued under this subsection shall be based upon the number of points assigned to each applicant for a particular species,” deleted “Effective January 1, 2000,” at the beginning of the third sentence, made a related change; rewrote (c), which read, “For the 1995 hunting season and each hunting season thereafter, except as provided in subsection (f) of this section or by rule of the commission, no person who is issued a hunting license for a grizzly bear or for a mountain goat shall be eligible to apply for or receive a hunting license for that particular species in any future year”; and substituted “ninety percent (90%) of the bighorn sheep, wild bison, moose, mountain goat and grizzly bear licenses to be issued in any one (1) year for resident hunters and the remaining ten percent (10%) of the bighorn sheep, wild bison, moose, mountain goat and grizzly bear licenses shall be reserved for nonresident hunters” for “eighty percent (80%) of the moose and seventy-five percent (75%) of the ram and ewe and lamb bighorn sheep, mountain goat and grizzly bear licenses to be issued in any one (1) year for resident hunters” in the first sentence of (e).

Editor's note. —

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 2, authorizes the game and fish commission to adopt rules and regulations implementing the provisions of the act upon the effective date of this section.

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 3(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 2, provides: “Licenses issued under title 23 of the Wyoming statutes before January 1, 2019, shall expire in accordance with the applicable provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act.”

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 3, provides: “Before January 1, 2019, the game and fish commission shall promulgate rules on license expirations and reservations of unused limited quota, full price big or trophy game animal licenses consistent with and in order to fully implement the requirements of section 1 of this act that become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 8, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

Constitutionality. —

Nonresident hunter failed to establish a violation of the Equal Protection Clause with regard to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

23-2-101

and

23-1-703

, which charge higher fees for nonresident hunters and establish a quota system for licenses, because the statutes are reasonably related to a number of legitimate ends because they help with the costs of managing wildlife and regulate the resource's safe and efficient use. Schutz v. Thorne, 415 F.3d 1128,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 13906

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2005), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 1174, 126 S. Ct. 1340, 164 L. Ed. 2d 55, 2006 U.S. LEXIS 1203 (U.S. 2006).

Stated

in

Holloway v. Wyo. Game & Fish Comm'n, 2005 WY 144, 122 P.3d 959,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(2005).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Reserving Wildlife for Resident Consumption: Is the Dormant Commerce Clause the Outfitters' White Knight?,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 125 (1997).

§ 23-1-704.
Licenses; expiration.

All licenses issued on or after January 1, 2019, expire as provided in commission rules except as otherwise provided in this title.

History.

Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 23-37; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-26; 2018 ch. 89, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “All licenses expire on the last day of the year in which issued except as otherwise provided.”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 2, provides: “Licenses issued under title 23 of the Wyoming statutes before January 1, 2019, shall expire in accordance with the applicable provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 8, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

§ 23-1-705.
Complimentary licenses; pioneer licenses; antelope hunt licenses; gunpowder and buckskin hunt licenses; gratuitous licenses; donated licenses.

At the request of the governor, the commission shall annually issue up to twenty-five (25) complimentary hunting and twenty-five (25) complimentary fishing licenses. Not more than five (5) bighorn sheep, five (5) moose and five (5) wild bison licenses shall be issued under this subsection. The five (5) year restriction imposed on the receipt of a moose, bighorn sheep or wild bison license by W.S. 23-1-703(b) and (c), and any restriction imposed on taking of wild bison under commission rule and regulation shall not be applicable in any manner to a license issued pursuant to this subsection. Except as provided under subsection (g) of this section, no complimentary licenses may be issued at the request of the appointed commissioners. Immediately upon issuance of any of these licenses, the commission shall submit to the secretary of state for maintenance as a public record, the name and address of each licensee and the type of license issued.

In addition the commission may, upon payment of proper fees, issue up to one hundred sixty (160) antelope licenses each year for the exclusive use of not more than two (2) antelope hunts, provided that:

Not more than eighty (80) of these licenses are issued for a single antelope hunt event;

Resource management requirements shall be considered in determining the total amount of licenses that are issued under this subsection each year.

In addition the commission may, upon payment of deer license fees, issue up to twenty-five (25) licenses each year for the exclusive use of gunpowder and buckskin hunts.

The department shall issue without charge lifetime bird, small game and fish licenses that shall remain valid so long as the licensee remains a Wyoming resident to:

Any resident who is over sixty-five (65) years and who has resided in Wyoming for at least thirty (30) total years. No year of residence prior to the resident’s tenth birthday shall be counted toward the thirty (30) year requirement imposed by this paragraph;

Any honorably discharged resident veteran who is one hundred percent (100%) disabled as determined by the United States department of veteran affairs;

Any honorably discharged resident who is a United States military purple heart medal recipient with document proof thereof.

The department shall issue:

For a fee of two dollars ($2.00) a resident deer, antelope or wild turkey license and for a fee of five dollars ($5.00) an elk license to any resident who is at least seventy-five (75) years of age prior to the issuance of the license and who has continuously resided in Wyoming for at least the fifty (50) years immediately preceding application for the license;

For a fee established by rule of the commission a resident deer, antelope, wild turkey or elk license to any resident who is at least seventy (70) years of age prior to the issuance of the license and has continuously resided in Wyoming for at least fifty (50) years immediately preceding application for the license. The fee established for a license under this paragraph shall be not more than sixty-five percent (65%) nor less than sixty percent (60%) of the resident fee specified in W.S.

23-2-101

for the particular species;

Without charge a resident elk or deer license in any hunt area not subject to prescribed means of competitive public issuance, a resident game bird and a resident small game license to any resident who is on active duty in the United States military deployed to a combat zone who is home on leave during the applicable hunting season. Application under this section shall include proof of residency required under W.S.

23-2-101

(a), certification of the applicant’s active duty deployment to a combat zone and other information required by rule and regulation of the commission. For purposes of this paragraph, a combat zone is any area which the president of the United States designates by executive order as an area in which the armed forces of the United States are engaged in combat;

Without charge a resident archery license to any resident who is at least seventy-five (75) years of age prior to the issuance of the license and has continuously resided in Wyoming for at least fifty (50) years immediately preceding application for the license;

A pioneer resident trapping license for furbearing animals in accordance with the fee specified in W.S. 23-2-301(c)(xiv), to any resident who is at least sixty-five (65) years of age prior to the issuance of the license and has resided in Wyoming for at least thirty (30) years.

Applicants for licenses specified in subsections (b) and (c) shall apply in person to any authorized department personnel.

In addition to complimentary licenses under subsection (a) of this section, each appointed commissioner may cause to be issued at cost not more than a total of eight (8) elk, deer or antelope designated licenses per year. All licenses issued under this subsection shall be designated to nonprofit charitable organizations. As a condition of accepting the license, the organization shall agree to auction or otherwise bid the license to the highest bidder or to raffle the license to members of the public.

In addition the commission may, upon receipt of payment of fees at a cost equal to the resident antelope license fee specified under W.S. 23-2-101(j)(xxx), issue up to a total of fifty (50) antelope licenses each year for the exclusive distribution by nonprofit organizations dedicated to providing hunting opportunities to individuals with disabilities for use by those individuals for hunting opportunities.

In addition the commission may issue upon payment of proper fees any number, set by rule and regulation, of antelope licenses, deer licenses, elk licenses and turkey licenses each year for the exclusive use by persons twenty (20) years of age or younger with life threatening illnesses who are sponsored by a nonprofit charitable organization with a mission to provide opportunities and experiences to persons with life threatening or serious illnesses. As a condition of issuing the license, the sponsoring organization shall pay the appropriate license fee on behalf of the licensee and at no cost to the licensee.

The holder of any valid big game animal license, trophy game animal license, any wild bison license or a female or calf wild bison license may surrender said license to the department for reissuance to a veteran with disabilities or a person with a permanent disability who uses a wheelchair as established by commission rule and regulation selected and sponsored by a nonprofit charitable organization providing hunting opportunities to a veteran with disabilities or a person with a permanent disability who uses a wheelchair. Any license reissued in accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall be for the same species, area and license type as the license donated. The license shall be reissued by the department to a qualifying person at no fee. Any license donated and reissued under the provisions of this subsection shall not be sold, traded, auctioned or offered for any monetary value and shall not be issued to, or used by, any person other than a qualifying person under the provision of this section and in compliance with commission rule and regulation. Licenses reissued to persons pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to residency, drawing or fee requirements under W.S.

23-2-101

or

23-2-107

. The five (5) year restriction imposed on the receipt of a cow or calf moose or a ewe or lamb bighorn sheep license by W.S. 23-1-703(b), the lifetime restriction imposed on the receipt of a grizzly bear, mountain goat, ram or any bighorn sheep, any wild bison or any moose or antlered moose license by W.S. 23-1-703(c) or the restrictions imposed on a wild bison under W.S.

23-2-107

(f) shall not be applicable in any manner to a license issued pursuant to this subsection.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 34; 1943, ch. 112, § 6; 1945, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 47-207; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 1949, ch. 90, § 1; 1951, ch. 71, § 1; 1955, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-86; Laws 1959, ch. 196, § 1; 1961, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 132, § 1; ch. 147, § 1; ch. 184, § 3; 1969, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 75, § 1; ch. 129, §§ 8, 9; 1971, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 199, § 1; ch. 233, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-27; Laws 1979, ch. 29, § 1; ch. 79, § 1; 1987, ch. 107, § 1; 1989, ch. 196, § 1; 1994, ch. 88, § 1; 1997, ch. 24, § 1; 1999, ch. 18, § 1; ch. 192, § 1; 2000, ch. 55, § 1; 2003, ch. 194, § 1; 2004, ch. 46, § 1; 2006, ch. 76, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2009, ch. 26, § 1; 2011, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 42, § 1; ch. 176, § 1; 2012, ch. 97, § 1; 2013 ch. 54, § 1, effective February 15, 2013; 2013 ch. 149, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 50, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2015 ch. 130, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 23, § 1, effective January 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 10, § 1, effective March 9, 2018; 2020 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (j).

The 2006 amendment,

effective August 1, 2006, added (e)(iii).

The 2008 amendment

deleted the former last sentence of (j) pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted (j) for former (j) which read:
“(j)
In addition the commission may issue upon payment of proper fees up to ten (10) antelope licenses, ten (10) deer licenses, five (5) elk licenses and ten (10) turkey licenses each year for the exclusive distribution by nonprofit charitable organizations for use by persons eighteen (18) years of age or younger with life threatening illnesses.
As a condition of accepting the license, the organization shall agree to provide the license at no cost to the licensee and to report the distribution of all licenses received under this subsection to the department.”

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment by ch 28, § 1, effective January 1, 2012, inserted “wild turkey” in (e)(i) and (e)(ii); and made related changes.

The second 2011 amendment by ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, added (k).

The third 2011 amendment by ch. 176, § 1, deleted “and” at the end of (e)(i).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment

, effective January 1, 2013, in (e)(i), substituted “is at least seventy-five (75) years of age prior to the issuance of the license” for “was born on or before January 1, 1930,” and substituted “fifty (50)” for “forty (40)”; and deleted “was born after January 1, 1930” after “resident who” in (e)(ii).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, in (k), inserted “or a person with a permanent disability who uses a wheelchair” or similar language twice in the first sentence; and substituted “person” or variants for “disabled veteran” or variants in the third through fifth sentences.

Laws 2015, ch. 50, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2015 second amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, effective January 1, 2016, in (h), substituted “fees at a cost equal to the resident antelope license fee specified under
W.S. 23-2-101(j)(xxx)” for “antelope license fees.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective January 1, 2017, in (d), deleted “or” following “for the license,” and added “and to any United States military purple heart medal recipient with document proof thereof” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment,
by ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), deleted “Except
as provided in subsection (d) of this section” from the beginning
of the first sentence.

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (a),
deleted “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section”
from the beginning of the first sentence.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, redesignated (d) as the introductory language of (d) and (d)(i) through (d)(iii) and made related changes; in the introductory language of (d) substituted “licenses that shall remain valid so long as the licensee remains a Wyoming resident to” for “licenses to”; in (d)(i) substituted “resident who” for “resident or honorably discharged veteran who,” “has resided” for “has continuously resided,” and “least thirty (30) total years. No year of residence prior to the resident's tenth birthday shall be counted toward the thirty (30) year requirement imposed by this paragraph” for “least the thirty (30) years immediately preceding application for the license, to”; in (d)(ii) substituted “honorably discharged resident veteran” for “disabled veteran”; and in (d)(iii) substituted “Any honorably discharged resident who is a United States military” for “Any United States military” and deleted the last sentence, which read “The license is valid so long as the licensee remains a Wyoming resident.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (e)(iv).

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (k) substituted “valid big game animal license, trophy game animal license, an any wild bison license or a female or calf wild bison license may surrender” for “valid big game license may surrender,” “under W.S.

23-2-101

or

23-2-107

” for “under W.S.

23-2-101

,” and “W.S. 23-1-703(c) or the restrictions imposed on the harvest of a wild bison under W.S.

23-2-107

(f) shall” for “W.S. 23-1-703(c) shall” and made related changes.

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added “pioneer licenses;” in the section heading; and added (e)(v).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a), substituted “bighorn” for “big horn” twice, in the third sentence, added “or wild bison,” added “and (c),”; in (k), in the first sentence, deleted “an” preceding “any wild bison,” substituted “to a veteran with disabilities or a person with a permanent disability who uses a wheelchair” for “for disabled veterans or persons with permanent disabilities who use wheelchairs” at the end, in the sixth sentence, added “cow or calf,” substituted “a ewe or lamb bighorn” for “big horn,” added “, ram or any bighorn sheep, any wild bison or any moose or antlered moose,” deleted “the harvest of” following “imposed on”; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 117, § 2, provides: “This act shall only apply to lifetime bird, small game and fish licenses issued on or after the effective date of this act.”

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”